tr: Destek ayağı sayısı: Çatal ayak; Tek ayak; Beşli ayak; Dörtlü ayak; Tripod; Diğer
ro-RO: Numărul de picioare de sprijin: Bipod; Monopied; Pentapod; Cvadripod; Trepied; Altele
sl-SI: Število podpornih nog: Dvonožec; Enonožec; Petnožec; Štirinožec; Tronožec; Drugo
ja: サポート脚数: 2脚; 1脚; 5脚; 4脚; 3脚; その他
el: Αριθμός ποδιών υποστήριξης: Δίποδο; Μονόποδο; Πεντάποδο; Τετράποδο; Τρίποδο; Άλλο
pt-BR: Apoio número de pernas: Bipé; Monopé; Pentapé; Quadrupé; Tripé; Outros
hr-HR: Broj noga za podršku: Dvonožac; Monopod; Petonožac; Četveronožac; Tronožac; Ostalo
it: Numero di gambe di supporto: Bipede; Monopiede; Pentapode; Quadrupode; Treppiede; Altro
sk-SK: Počet podporných nôh: Dvojnožka; Jednonožka; Päťnožka; Štvornožka; Statív; Iné
de: Anzahl der Stützbeine: Zweibein; Einbein; Fünfbein; Vierbein; Dreibein; Sonstige
ru: Количество опорных ножек: Бипод; Монопод; Пентапод; Квадропод; Трипод; Другое
en: Support leg count: Bipod; Monopod; Pentapod; Quadrupod; Tripod; Other
sv: Antal stödben: Tvåbent; Enbent; Fembent; Fyrbent; Trebent; Övrigt
da: Antal støtteben: Bipod; Monopod; Pentapod; Quadrupod; Tripod; Andet
zh-CN: 支撑腿数量: 两脚架; 单脚架; 五脚架; 四脚架; 三脚架; 其他
fr: Nombre de pieds du support: Bipied; Monopode; Pentapode; Quadrupode; Trépied; Autre
fi: Tukijalkojen määrä: Kaksijalka; Yksijalka; Viisijalka; Nelijalka; Kolmijalka; Muu
bg-BG: Брой опорни крака: Двунога; Монопод; Пентапод; Четиринога; Триножник; Друго
ko: 지지대 다리 수: 2각대; 1각대; 5각대; 4각대; 3각대; 기타
es: Cantidad de patas del bastón: Bípode; Monopie; Pentápodo; Cuadrípode; Trípode; Otro
cs: Počet opěrných nohou: Dvojnožka (bipod); Monopod; Pětinožka; Čtyřnožka; Stativ / trojnožka; Jiné
pl: Liczba wsporników: Dwójnóg; Monopod; Pięcionóg; Czwórnóg; Trójnóg; Inne
nl: Ondersteuningspoot aantal: Tweepoot; Eenpoot; Vijfpoot; Vierpoot; Driepoot; Overig
vi: Số lượng chân hỗ trợ: Chân chống hai chân; Chân đơn; Chân chống năm chân; Chân chống bốn chân; Chân chống ba chân; Khác
lt-LT: Atraminių kojų skaičius: Dvikojis; Vienakojis; Penkiakojis; Keturkojis; Trikojis; Kitas
nb: Antall støtteben: Tofot; Monopod; Femfot; Firfot; Tripod; Annet
hu: támogatás lábszám: Kétlábú állvány; Egylábú állvány; Ötlábú állvány; Négylábú állvány; Háromlábú állvány; Egyéb
th: ช่วยเหลือการนับขา: ขาทราย (2 ขา); ขาตั้งเดี่ยว; ขาตั้ง 5 ขา; ขาตั้ง 4 ขา; ขาตั้ง 3 ขา; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 支撐腳架數量: 兩腳架; 單腳架; 五腳架; 四腳架; 三腳架; 其他
pt-PT: Número de pernas de apoio: Bipé; Monopé; Pentapé; Quadrupé; Tripé; Outro